New York, session 2025-2026, A3910.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Every renewable energy generating project receiving grants, 2 guaranteed loans, tax benefits or funding from New York state, shall 3 demonstrate that the developer or other entities owning such renewable 4 generating project has entered into a memorandum of understanding for 5 the operation and maintenance of such project with a bona fide labor 6 organization of jurisdiction that is actively engaged in representing 7 transitioning utility workers in the fossil fuel industry. Such memoran- 8 dum shall be entered into prior to the completion date of such project 9 and the memorandum shall be an ongoing material condition of authori- 10 zation to operate and maintain the renewable energy project. The memo- 11 randum shall only apply to employees necessary for the maintenance and 12 operation of such renewable energy generation project. Such memorandum 13 shall contain, but not be limited to, safety and training standards, 14 disaster response measures, guaranteed hours, staffing levels, pay rate 15 protection and retraining programs. 16 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05823-01-5